District of Columbia statutes.
28-4518

Relation to other law.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be applicable to conduct or activity specifically regulated, permitted, or required by any regulatory body, agency, or commission acting under statutory authority of the District of Columbia or the United States.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-169, § 2, 27 DCR 5368
1981 Ed., § 28-4518.